Utah statutes.
9-7-404.   Board powers and duties -- Library fund deposits and
disbursements.
(1)  The library board of directors may, with the approval of the city
governing body:
(a)  have control of the expenditure of the library fund, of construction,
lease, or sale of library buildings and land, and of the operation and care of
the library; and
(b)  purchase, lease, or sell land, and purchase, lease, erect, or sell
buildings for the benefit of the library.
(2)  The board shall:
(a)  maintain and care for the library;
(b)  establish policies for its operation; and
(c)  in general, carry out the spirit and intent of the provisions of this
part.
(3)  All tax moneys received for the library shall be deposited in the city
treasury to the credit of the library fund, and may not be used for any
purpose except that of the city library.  These funds shall be drawn upon by
the authorized officers of the city upon presentation of the properly
authenticated vouchers of the library board.  All moneys collected by the
library shall be deposited to the credit of the library fund.
